Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska41-205
Boarding house, defined.

Boarding house shall mean every building or other structure kept, used, maintained, advertised, or held out to the public to be a place where sleeping and other accommodations are furnished for pay to transient or permanent guests in which five or more rooms are used for the accommodation of such guests, which maintains a dining room, cafe, or common kitchen for the use of the guests in connection therewith, and in which social or domestic services may be provided at the request of the guest to assist such guest in daily living activities, and which has not been designated as a hotel, restaurant, or cafe.

Laws 1982, LB 547, § 5.